District of Columbia statutes.
42-3141.05

Notice of violation; service of notice.

(a)

If an owner elects to abate the graffiti and the graffiti has not been abated by the date stated on the notice, the Mayor may issue a notice of violation for failure to comply with § 42-3141.02.

(b)

(1)

The notice of violation shall be served on the owner, or the building superintendent, or the Mayor may deliver the notice by certified mail to the owner of the premises. If the owner cannot be identified with reasonable certainty, the Mayor may conspicuously post the notice on the premises alleged to be in violation and deliver a copy of the notice to the Deputy Chief Financial Officer pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.

(2)

The Deputy Chief Financial Officer is authorized to receive notices of violation of § 42-3141.02 on behalf of any resident or non-resident person who owns property in the District, if the person has not provided to the Deputy Chief Financial Officer a mailing address. The Deputy Chief Financial Officer shall post a copy of the notice served on the Deputy Chief Financial Officer in a conspicuous place on the property.

Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 6, 57 DCR 4353
This section is referenced in § 42-3141.03 and § 42-3141.11.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).